Massachusetts, session 194th, H4072.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 33 of chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by adding the following subsection:-
(38) No fee shall be assessed or collected by the registrar or their authorized agent from a
nonprofit for a request search or copies of any driving records of the nonprofit’s employees and
volunteers.
of 1